Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 47. Insanity and Competency to Stand Trial.
Sec. 12.47.120.
Determination of sanity after commitment.

When, in the medical judgment of the custodian of an accused person committed under AS

12.47.110

, the accused is considered to be mentally competent to stand trial, the committing court shall hold a hearing, after due notice, as soon as conveniently possible. At the hearing, evidence as to the mental condition of the accused may be submitted including reports by the custodian to whom the accused was committed for care.

If at the hearing the court determines that the accused is presently mentally competent to understand the nature of the proceedings against the accused and to assist in the accused’s own defense, appropriate criminal proceedings may be commenced against the accused.

If at the hearing the court determines that the accused is still presently mentally incompetent, the court shall recommit the accused in accordance with AS

12.47.110

.

A finding by the court that the accused is mentally competent to stand trial in no way prejudices the accused in a defense based on mental disease or defect excluding responsibility. This finding may not be introduced in evidence on that issue or otherwise brought to the notice of the jury.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Incompetency to proceed — AS

12.47.100

Commitment on finding of incompetency — AS

12.47.110

Original Code Provision — AS 12.45.115.

Sec. 12.47.130.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“affirmative defense” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

;

“assist in the defendant’s own defense” means to consult with a lawyer while exercising a reasonable degree of rational functioning;

“culpable mental state” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

;

“incompetent” means a defendant is unable to understand the proceedings against the defendant or to assist in the defendant’s own defense;

“mental disease or defect” means a disorder of thought or mood that substantially impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to cope with the ordinary demands of life; “mental disease or defect” also includes intellectual and developmental disabilities that result in significantly below average general intellectual functioning that impairs a person’s ability to adapt to or cope with the ordinary demands of life;

“understand the proceedings against the defendant” means that the defendant’s elementary mental process is such that the defendant has a reasonably rational comprehension of the proceedings.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 62 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (2) was enacted as (4) and paragraph (4) was enacted as (5). Renumbered in 1996, at which time former paragraph (2) was renumbered as (3) and former paragraph (3) was renumbered as (5), alphabetizing the defined terms.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (5), substituted “intellectual and developmental disabilities that result in” for “mental retardation, which means a”.